West Virginia, session 2025, HB2278.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8. Authorization for Department of Transportation to promulgate legislative rules. §64-8-1. Division of Motor Vehicles. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 14, 2024, authorized under the authority of §17D-2-2 of this code, modified by the Division of Motor Vehicles to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 4, 2024, relating to the Division of Motor Vehicles (disclosure of information from the files of the Division of Motor Vehicles, 91 CSR 08), is authorized.